Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that campers, travel trailers, and travel vans offer simplified amenities that are not the same as motor homes. People who own travel vans typically have other vehicles that have paid the motor vehicle excise tax to the regional transportation authority. Travel van usage does not typically result in more trips on the public transportation system. Therefore, the legislature declares that travel vans, like campers and travel trailers, are exempt from the motor vehicle excise tax.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Travel van" means a vehicle with a body that fully encloses the driver and offers aspects of a temporary living area. The distance from the leading edge of the windshield to the foremost body section of vans is typically shorter than that of pickup trucks and sport utility vehicles. These vehicles are described by the manufacturer as a travel or camper van, not a motor home.Sec. 3. RCW 46.04.305 and 1990 c 250 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:"Motor homes" means motor vehicles originally designed, reconstructed, or permanently altered to provide facilities for human habitation, which include lodging and cooking or sewage disposal, and is enclosed within a solid body shell with the vehicle, but excludes a camper or like unit constructed separately and affixed to a motor vehicle or a travel van as defined in section 2 of this act.Sec. 4. RCW 82.44.125 and 2010 c 161 s 908 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The motor vehicle excise tax authorized under this chapter applies to the following vehicles:(a) Commercial trailers, as defined in RCW 46.04.136;(b) Farm trucks registered under RCW 46.16A.425;(c) Fixed load vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.186;(d) Motor homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.305;(e) Motor trucks, as defined in RCW 46.04.310, with a scale weight greater than ((six thousand))6,000 pounds;(f) Motor vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.320; and(g) Trailers, as defined in RCW 46.04.620.(2) The motor vehicle excise tax authorized under this chapter does not apply to the following vehicles:(a) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;(b) Dock and warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers;(c) Equipment not designed primarily for use on public highways;(d) Exempt registered vehicles;(e) Lumber carriers of the type known as spiders;(f) Mobile homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.302;(g) Passenger motor vehicles, as described in RCW 82.44.015;(h) Travel trailers, as defined in RCW 46.04.623;(i) Travel vans, as defined in section 2 of this act;(j) Vehicles not used on the public highways; and(((j)))(k) Vehicles owned by nonresident military personnel of the armed forces of the United States stationed in the state of Washington if the nonresident military member was a nonresident of this state when enlisted into military service.--- END ---